Hawaii, session 2026, SB1083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that maintenance dredging is critical to the upkeep of small boat harbors, channels, ramps, and other port infrastructure in the State. The legislature further finds that the current process of waiting until dredging is imminent to appropriate funds and only then initiating the permitting process creates a haphazard system for the allocation of money and the issuance of permits.  This disorganized process sometimes contributes to worsened conditions at these facilities when increased amounts of marine sediment and foreign debris accumulate, sometimes up to a height that can damage the hulls of ships if not cleared immediately.  These unsafe conditions can potentially cause a shutdown of the affected sites, which are important for recreation and subsistence fishing and other use by the general public. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of land and natural resources to conduct maintenance dredging at certain state small boat harbors, boat launch ramp facilities, and other state boating facilities and waterways. SECTION 2. Chapter 200, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§200-     Maintenance dredging of small boat harbors costs; inclusion in annual budget request.  Beginning with fiscal biennium 2027-2029 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall include in its annual budget request line-item funding for maintenance dredging at state small boat harbor facilities." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of conducting maintenance dredging at state small boat harbors, boat launch ramp facilities, and other state boating facilities and waterways, including design, permitting, and dredging work, as identified by the department of land and natural resources. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.